Nebraska, session 109, LB884.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB884 LB884
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 32-202.01, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, is amended to read:
32-202.01 The Secretary of State shall develop a process to use the
information in possession of or available to his or her office including
the federal Systematic Alien Verification for Entitlements Program, to
match and verify the citizenship of the corresponding registered voter.
The process developed shall ensure that no registered voter is removed
from the voter registration register in violation of state or federal
law. The Attorney General and the Department of Motor Vehicles shall
cooperate with the Secretary of State for such purpose. The Secretary of
State may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to carry out this
section.
Sec. 2. Section 32-806, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
32-806 All official ballots prepared pursuant to the Election Act
shall be white in color, except that the election commissioner, county
clerk, or city or village clerk may designate a distinctive color of
ballot or ink for city, village, or school elections or, when authorized
by the Secretary of State, for elections of any other political
subdivision. If a distinctive color is designated, the color of the
ballot shall not be the same as the sample ballots as provided in section
32-804. The style and size of type on official ballots shall be as close
as possible to the style used on the ballots furnished by the Secretary
of State. No ballot or envelope for a ballot shall display any indication
of the voter's political party affiliation on its exterior.
Sec. 3. Section 32-1010, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-1010 Ballots shall be counted at a centralized location or at
polling places as provided in sections 32-1012 to 32-1018. If counting
takes place at a centralized location:
(1) The , the receiving board shall deliver the ballot box and other
-2-

LB884 LB884
2026 2026
election materials to the centralized location as directed by the
election commissioner or county clerk; .
(2) The deliverer of the ballots shall deliver the ballots directly
to such centralized location and shall make no stops other than at the
centralized location; and
(3) Ballots shall not be removed from the ballot box at a polling
location but shall be transported to the centralized location in the
ballot box in which they were originally deposited except where the poll
watchers of two different political parties appointed in accordance with
section 32-1013 observe such removal.
Sec. 4. Section 32-1013, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
32-1013 (1) In each counting location, watchers may be appointed to
be present and observe the counting of ballots. Each political party
shall be entitled to one watcher at each location appointed and supplied
with credentials by the county central committee of such political party.
The district court having jurisdiction over any such county may appoint
additional watchers for any location.
(2) The watchers and the members of the counting board shall take
the following oath administered by the election commissioner or county
clerk or an election official designated by the election commissioner or
county clerk: I do solemnly swear that I will not in any manner make
known to anyone other than duly authorized election officials the results
of the votes as they are being counted until the polls have officially
closed and the summary of votes cast is delivered to the election
commissioner or county clerk.
(3) Except for polling places using precinct-based optical scanners,
all other persons shall be excluded from the place where the counting is
being conducted except for observers authorized by the election
commissioner or county clerk. No such observer shall be connected with
any candidate, political party, or measure on the ballot.
-3-

LB884 LB884
2026 2026
(4) No such watcher or observer shall be excluded from the counting
location unless the election commissioner or county clerk provides an
unobstructed view of the counting of ballots by use of closed-circuit
television or similar device that provides the ability to plainly see and
hear all actions taken during the counting of the ballots. This includes
the verification of signatures and the opening of envelopes relating to
early voting described in section 32-1027.
Sec. 5. Section 32-1027, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
32-1027 (1) The election commissioner or county clerk shall appoint
two or more registered voters to the counting board for early voting. One
registered voter shall be appointed from the political party casting the
highest number of votes for Governor or for President of the United
States in the county in the immediately preceding general election, and
one registered voter shall be appointed from the political party casting
the next highest vote for such office. The election commissioner or
county clerk may appoint additional registered voters to serve on the
counting board and may appoint registered voters to serve in case of a
vacancy among any of the members of the counting board. Such appointees
shall be balanced between the political parties and may include
registered voters unaffiliated with any political party. The counting
board may begin carrying out its duties not earlier than the second
Friday before the election and shall meet as directed by the election
commissioner or county clerk. Watchers appointed in accordance with
section 32-1013 shall be permitted the opportunity to observe the
counting process for early voting.
(2) The counting board shall place all identification envelopes in
order and shall review each returned identification envelope pursuant to
verification procedures prescribed in subsections (3) and (4) of this
section.
(3) In its review, the counting board shall determine if:
-4-

LB884 LB884
2026 2026
(a) The voter has provided his or her name, residence address, and
signature on the voter identification envelope;
(b) The ballot has been received from the voter who requested it and
the residence address is the same address provided on the voter's request
for a ballot for early voting, by comparing the information provided on
the identification envelope with information recorded in the record of
early voters or the voter's request;
(c) A completed and signed registration application has been
received from the voter by the deadline in section 32-302, 32-321, or
32-325 or by the close of the polls pursuant to section 32-945;
(d) An identification document has been received from the voter not
later than the close of the polls on election day if required pursuant to
section 32-318.01; and
(e) A completed and signed registration application and oath has
been received from the voter by the close of the polls on election day if
required pursuant to section 32-946.
(4) On the basis of its review, the counting board shall determine
whether the ballot shall be counted or rejected as follows:
(a) A ballot received from a voter who was properly registered on or
prior to the deadline for registration pursuant to section 32-302 or
32-321 shall be accepted for counting without further review if:
(i) The name on the identification envelope appears to be that of a
registered voter to whom a ballot for early voting has been issued or
sent;
(ii) The residence address provided on the identification envelope
is the same residence address at which the voter is registered or is in
the same precinct and subdivision of a precinct, if any; and
(iii) The identification envelope has been signed by the voter;
(b) In the case of a ballot received from a voter who was not
properly registered prior to the deadline for registration pursuant to
section 32-302 or 32-321, the ballot shall be accepted for counting if:
-5-

LB884 LB884
2026 2026
(i) A valid registration application completed and signed by the
voter has been received by the election commissioner or county clerk
prior to the close of the polls on election day;
(ii) The name on the identification envelope appears to be that of
the person who requested the ballot;
(iii) The residence address provided on the identification envelope
and on the registration application is the same as the residence address
as provided on the voter's request for a ballot for early voting; and
(iv) The identification envelope has been signed by the voter;
(c) In the case of a ballot received from a voter without a
residence address who requested a ballot pursuant to section 32-946, the
ballot shall be accepted for counting if:
(i) The name on the identification envelope appears to be that of a
registered voter to whom a ballot has been sent;
(ii) A valid registration application completed and signed by the
voter, for whom the residence address is deemed to be the address of the
office of the election commissioner or county clerk pursuant to section
32-946, has been received by the election commissioner or county clerk
prior to the close of the polls on election day;
(iii) The oath required pursuant to section 32-946 has been
completed and signed by the voter and received by the election
commissioner or county clerk by the close of the polls on election day;
and
(iv) The identification envelope has been signed by the voter;
(d) In the case of a ballot received from a registered voter
required to present identification before voting pursuant to section
32-318.01, the ballot shall be accepted for counting if:
(i) The name on the identification envelope appears to be that of a
registered voter to whom a ballot has been issued or sent;
(ii) The residence address provided on the identification envelope
is the same address at which the voter is registered or is in the same
-6-

LB884 LB884
2026 2026
precinct and subdivision of a precinct, if any;
(iii) A copy of an identification document authorized in section
32-318.01 has been received by the election commissioner or county clerk
prior to the close of the polls on election day; and
(iv) The identification envelope has been signed by the voter; and
(e) In the case of a ballot received from a registered voter who
filled out a reasonable impediment certification pursuant to section
32-912.02, the ballot shall be accepted for counting if:
(i) The signature on the certification matches the signature on file
with the election commissioner or county clerk;
(ii) The election commissioner or county clerk verifies that the
voter does not have a current, unexpired driver's license or state
identification card issued by the State of Nebraska;
(iii) The name on the identification envelope appears to be that of
a registered voter to whom a ballot has been issued or sent;
(iv) The residence address provided on the identification envelope
is the same address at which the voter is registered or is in the same
precinct and subdivision of a precinct, if any; and
(v) The identification envelope has been signed by the voter.
(5) In opening the identification envelope or the return envelope to
determine if registration applications, oaths, or identification
documents have been enclosed by the voters from whom they are required,
the counting board shall make a good faith effort to ensure that the
ballot remains folded and that the secrecy of the vote is preserved.
(6) The counting board may, on the second Friday before the
election, open all identification envelopes which are approved, and if
the signature of the election commissioner or county clerk or his or her
employee is on the ballot, the ballot shall be unfolded, flattened for
purposes of using the optical scanner, and placed in a sealed container
for counting as directed by the election commissioner or county clerk. At
the discretion of the election commissioner or county clerk, the counting
-7-

LB884 LB884
2026 2026
board may begin counting early ballots no earlier than twenty-four hours
prior to the opening of the polls on the day of the election.
(7) If an identification envelope is rejected, the counting board
shall not open the identification envelope. The counting board shall
write Rejected on the identification envelope and the reason for the
rejection. If the ballot is rejected after opening the identification
envelope because of the absence of the official signature on the ballot,
the ballot shall be reinserted in the identification envelope which shall
be resealed and marked Rejected, no official signature. The counting
board shall place the rejected identification envelopes and ballots in a
container labeled Rejected Ballots and seal it.
(8) As soon as all ballots have been placed in the sealed container
and rejected identification envelopes or ballots have been sealed in the
Rejected Ballots container, the counting board shall count the ballots
the same as all other ballots and an unofficial count shall be reported
to the election commissioner or county clerk. No results shall be
released prior to the closing of the polls on election day.
Sec. 6. Original section 32-806, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, sections 32-202.01, 32-1010, and 32-1027, Revised Statutes
Cumulative Supplement, 2024, and section 32-1013, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-8-